Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-107 Inapplicable or inconsistent
provisions. If any provision of section 431:10A-105 to section 431:10A-111
is in whole or in part inapplicable to or inconsistent with the coverage
provided by a particular form of policy, the insurer shall omit from the policy
any inapplicable provision or part of a provision, and shall modify any
inconsistent provision or part of the provision to make the provision contained
in the policy consistent with the coverage provided by the policy. An officer
of the insurer shall certify conformity with the requirements of state statutes
in accordance with this section. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 116, §1(17)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next